District of Columbia statutes.
29-1013.02

Proper plaintiff.

(a)

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association shall be maintained only by a person that:

(1)

Is a member or a dissociated member at the time the action is commenced and:

(A)

Was a member when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

(B)

Whose status as a member devolved upon the person by operation of law or the organic rules from a person that was a member at the time of the conduct; and

(2)

Adequately represents the interests of the association.

(b)

If the sole plaintiff in a derivative action dies while the action is pending, the Superior Court may permit another member who meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section to be substituted as plaintiff.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1302 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.